Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1222
Continuing education; tuition, fees, expenses; how paid.

Tuition, fees, and other expenses incurred by a county attorney or deputy county attorney in fulfilling the requirements of section 23-1217 shall be paid by the county. Tuition, fees, and other expenses incurred by all other persons who may attend such programs of continuing legal education, including instruction providing a working knowledge of electronic speed measurement principles and instruction on the investigation and prosecution of crimes against children, shall be the responsibility of the person attending.

Laws 1980, LB 790, § 11;

Laws 1990, LB 1246, § 7.